District of Columbia statutes.
50-1214

Repealed

Place and method of recordation.

Repealed.

July 2, 1940, 54 Stat. 739, ch. 527, § 13
June 4, 1952, 66 Stat. 100, ch. 365, § 3
Aug. 5, 1963, 77 Stat. 119, Pub. L. 88-89, § 5
Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-279, § 201(h), 54 DCR 903
1981 Ed., § 40-1014.
1973 Ed., § 40-713.